Arkansas, session 2025, SB541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-50-1101(a)(3), concerning the
nonconsensual towing of a vehicle, implement, or piece of machinery, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(D)(i) If the owner of a vehicle, implement, or piece of
machinery removed under this section has not consented to the towing or
storage of the vehicle, implement, or piece of machinery, the towing and
storage company shall release the vehicle, implement, or piece of machinery
to the owner or the owner's representative, notwithstanding the failure of
the owner to satisfy the possessory lien held by the towing and storage
company or a county, city of the first class, city of the second class, or
incorporated town under § 27-50-1208 or under subdivision (a)(3)(A) — (C) of
this section.
(ii)(a) The owner of a vehicle, implement, or piece
*ZRC093*
03/20/2025 2:56:20 PM ZRC093

SB541
of machinery released under subdivision (a)(3)(D)(i) of this section shall
not sell the vehicle, implement, or piece of machinery without satisfying the
former possessory lien under § 27-50-1208 or under subdivisions (a)(3)(A) —
(C) of this section.
(b) A violation of subdivision
(a)(3)(D)(ii)(a) of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.
(c) In addition to the penalty provided in
subdivision (a)(3)(D)(ii)(b) of this section, a person who violates
subdivision (a)(3)(D)(ii)(a) of this section upon conviction shall be ordered
by the court to pay twice the amount of the possessory lien on the vehicle,
implement, or piece of equipment to the lien holder.

























03/20/2025 2:56:20 PM ZRC093